Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-714
Tax; delinquent; restrain severing resource; Attorney General; county attorney.

The Attorney General or the county attorney of the county wherein the natural resources are located may file a petition in the district court of such county, and upon such filing, such district court shall have the power to restrain by injunction any person from continuing to sever such oil products while delinquent in any report or the payment of any tax, penalty, or cost required under the provisions of sections 57-701 to 57-714.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 14, p. 614.